Utah statutes.
16-13-9.   Requirement before commencing business -- Cash consideration for
shares -- Minimum stated capital.
A development corporation incorporated after July 1, 1979, shall not transact
any business or incur any indebtedness, except as is incidental to its
organization or to obtain subscriptions to or payment for its shares, until
there has been paid in for the issuance of shares consideration in cash of at
least $300,000. A development corporation shall have a stated capital of not
less than $300,000.
